test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-leeqd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - lēʼḑ: # Noun 147 'eng /est leht/fin' - full paradigm
     lēʼḑ+N+Sg+Nom: [lēʼḑ, lēḑ]
     lēʼḑ+N+Sg+Gen: [līʼed, līed]
     lēʼḑ+N+Sg+Par: [līʼedtõ, līedtõ]
     lēʼḑ+N+Sg+Dat: [līʼedõn, līedõn]
     lēʼḑ+N+Sg+Ins: [līʼedkõks, līedkõks]
     lēʼḑ+N+Sg+Ill: [līʼedõ, līedõ]
     lēʼḑ+N+Sg+Ela: [līʼedstõ, līedstõ]
     lēʼḑ+N+Pl+Nom: [līʼedõd, līedõd]
     lēʼḑ+N+Pl+Gen: [līʼedõd, līedõd]
     lēʼḑ+N+Pl+Par: [lēʼḑi, lēḑi]
     lēʼḑ+N+Pl+Dat: [līʼedõdõn, līedõdõn]
     lēʼḑ+N+Pl+Ins: [līʼedõdõks, līedõdõks]
     lēʼḑ+N+Pl+Ill: [lēʼḑiž, lēḑiž]
     lēʼḑ+N+Pl+Ela: [lēʼḑist, lēḑist]
